Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB94.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 164.2951 is amended to read as follows:
(1) [Beginning with the 2012-2013 academic year and each academic year thereafter
]For first-time students enrolling in a public college or university, postsecondary
education institutions are encouraged to limit the credit-hour requirements to sixty
(60) credit hours for each associate of science or associate of arts degree program
and to one hundred twenty (120) credit hours for each bachelor of arts or bachelor
of science degree program, except in situations in which:
(a) Quality and content of a program would be negatively impacted; or
(b) A program must comply with specific program standards established by
external accreditation bodies.
(2) The council[ on Postsecondary Education], in collaboration with the public
universities and the Kentucky Community and Technical College
System[community and technical colleges], shall:
(a) Facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide agreement for
alignment of Kentucky Community and Technical College System lower-
division associate of arts and associate of science coursework that shall be
accepted and fully credited to related bachelors degree programs by all public
universities. The agreement shall specify the general education learning
outcomes and program-specific prerequisite learning outcomes of the
coursework. Where applicable, curricula shall be reviewed to determine
comparability of core content standards required under KRS 164.302. The
agreement shall direct that the associate of arts and associate of science
coursework meeting the learning outcomes specified shall be accepted for
transfer and degree credit, whether earned as individual courses or within
block programs;
Page 1 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 189
(b) Develop, implement, and maintain a Kentucky Community and Technical
College System statewide course numbering system for lower-division
general education and program-specific prerequisite courses that include the
same learning outcomes;
(c) 1. By July 1, 2028, develop, implement, and maintain statewide transfer
pathways consisting of up to sixty (60) credit hours that shall be
applied to the requirements of baccalaureate degree programs at any
participating public university.
2. Statewide transfer pathways for baccalaureate degree programs shall
be identified based on relevant factors, including but not limited to:
a. Student demand;
b. Workforce demands as demonstrated through data from the
Kentucky Center for Statistics; and
c. Existing commonalities in student learning outcomes up to the
first sixty (60) credit hours of baccalaureate degree programs
among two (2) or more public universities.
3. Each statewide transfer pathway shall consist of up to sixty (60) credit
hours that shall be available for transfer and application toward
degree requirements in the corresponding degree program or
programs at each participant institution. Students may earn credit in
statewide transfer pathways through any means prescribed by the
institution, including but not limited to credit for prior learning and
dual credit as defined by the council.
4. A public institution offering a baccalaureate program that would
otherwise be included in a statewide transfer pathway but is not
participating due to limited alignment in student learning outcomes
shall identify those courses in the pathway that will not be eligible for
Page 2 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 189
credit in a core course requirement and publish the list of courses on
the institution's website.
5. The council shall publish on its website a list of pathways, including
the existing statewide transfer pathways and participating institutions,
available to students;
(d) Establish a statewide course classification system and procedures to monitor
the transfer and crediting of lower-division coursework, including a system of
ongoing assessment that ensures comparability for transfer purposes;
(e)[(d)] Establish a procedure for approval of changes in learning outcomes at
public universities as described in subsection (3) of this section;
(f)[(e)] Standardize credit-by-exam equivalencies and common passing scores
for national exams transferable for general education courses and program-
specific prerequisites courses;
(g)[(f)] Develop policies to align statewide articulation and transfer procedures
across educational institutions, including admissions criteria, student
declaration of major, and student guidance and counseling policies designed
to ensure that students pursuing an associate of arts or associate of science
degree program provide timely notification of their intention to transfer to a
public university;
(h)[(g)] Develop uniform data collection and reporting methods to facilitate and
ensure statewide and institutional compliance with course transfer and credit
requirements;
(i)[(h)] Guarantee that, upon admission to a public university, graduates of an
associate of arts or an associate of science degree program approved by the
council in consultation with public universities shall be deemed to have met
all general education requirements;
(j)[(i)] Provide that graduates of approved associate of arts and associate of
Page 3 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 189
science degree programs of Kentucky public postsecondary institutions who
complete the prerequisite learning outcomes for a bachelor of arts or bachelor
of science program while fulfilling the requirements for an associate of art or
associate of science degree, shall not be required to repeat or to take any
additional lower-level courses to fulfill bachelor degree requirements in the
same major, and these students shall be granted admission to related upper-
division bachelors degree programs of a state public college or university on
the same criteria as those students earning lower-division credits at the
university to which the student transferred;
(k)[(j)] Provide that graduates of approved associate of arts and associate of
science degree programs shall receive priority for admission to a state public
university over out-of-state students if they meet the same admission criteria;
(l)[(k)] Establish a commonality in college transcripts to be used in all public
colleges and universities to facilitate transfer from community and technical
colleges;
(m)[(l)] Encourage private colleges and universities to collaborate with public
educational institutions in developing programs and agreement to expedite the
transfer of students and credits between institutions;
(n)[(m)] Establish an appeals process to resolve disagreements between
transferring students and receiving educational institutions regarding the
transfer and acceptance of credits earned at another institution;
(o)[(n)] Ensure that all articulation and transfer policies are consistent with the
rules and regulations established by all appropriate discipline-specific
accrediting bodies and institutional accrediting agencies as recognized by the
United States Department of Education; and
(p)[(o)] Facilitate the development and implementation of a statewide
standardized articulation agreement to be executed [by July 1, 2021, ]between
Page 4 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 189
public colleges and universities and the Kentucky Department of Education
for each approved high school career pathway that leads to a postsecondary
credential, certification, license, or degree. Upon meeting the requirements of
the standardized articulation agreement, a student shall be awarded
postsecondary credit for prior learning at any public college or university.
(3) Regardless of the existence of a council-identified statewide transfer pathway,
when an institution seeks to make changes to curricula that impacts the
transferability of credit[change learning outcomes] for a bachelor of arts or
bachelor of science program that affect lower-division courses, the
institution[university] shall notify the council[ on Postsecondary Education] and
the Kentucky Community and Technical College System of the proposed changes
at the same time as the initiation of the institution's[university's] approval process.
The council shall then provide written notification to all other public
postsecondary education institutions of the proposed change. If it is determined
that the proposed change will have an adverse effect on transferability, the
institution[university] proposing the change shall enter into discussion with the
council, the other public postsecondary education institutions, and the Kentucky
Community and Technical College System to verify there remains a clearly defined
path to transfer credits[a bachelor's degree] for those students who plan to transfer
from the Kentucky Community and Technical College System or another public
postsecondary education institution to the institution[public university]. The
council shall be responsible for coordinating the discussion among the public
postsecondary education institutions.
(4) Beginning July 1, 2028:
(a) Any student who transfers among participating public postsecondary
education institutions shall be awarded credit by the receiving institution for
courses satisfactorily completed by the student at any participating public
Page 5 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:47 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 189
postsecondary education institution when the credit was part of a statewide
transfer pathway available at both the earning institution and the receiving
institution; and
(b) Public postsecondary education institutions receiving transfer course credit
within a statewide transfer pathway shall accept and apply general
education courses and credit in the equivalent pathway at the receiving
institution. The credit shall be applied as first satisfying general education
core course credit requirements and program-specific general education
course credit requirements before being applied as elective credit.
Page 6 of 6
XXXX 1/5/2026 11:47 AM Jacketed